Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1 RECALL FROM OFFICE
1-12-111.7. Recall election notice - publication.

For a recall election of a state officer, the governor and the secretary of state shall publish notice of the recall election on their websites.

For a recall election for an officer other than a state officer, the designated election official shall publish notice of the recall election on its website or in a newspaper of general circulation in accordance with section 1-5-205.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1045, § 11, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1663, § 58, effective June 21.

1-12-112. Ballots - statement included.

In addition to all other requirements of law, the official ballot must contain the statement described in section 1-12-103 stating the grounds for demanding the officer's recall. The officer sought to be recalled may submit to the designated election official a statement of three hundred words or fewer justifying the officer's course of conduct. The officer shall not include any profane or false statements in the statement of justification. The officer shall submit the statement no later than ten days after the statement of sufficiency has been submitted or created. The official ballot must contain the statement of justification if submitted pursuant to this subsection (1).

Ballots for the election of a successor to the officer sought to be recalled must contain the candidates' names, which must be placed on the ballot by lot.

The official ballot for the election of a successor to the officer sought to be recalled shall contain a blank space in which the elector may write the name of a write-in candidate who has timely filed an affidavit of intent in accordance with section 1-12-115.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 796, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1063, § 7, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1045, § 12, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1663, § 59, effective June 21.

1-12-113. Conduct and timing of recall election.

Except as modified by this article, the recall election and election of a successor shall be conducted according to articles 1 to 13 of this title.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 1, for a recall election, all events in the uniform election code that are to be completed by the secretary of state, designated election official, or coordinated election official on or before the forty-fifth day prior to the election must be completed no later than the thirty-fifth day prior to the recall election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 796, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1045, § 13, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1663, § 60, effective June 21.

1-12-114. Mail ballots - plan required - voter service and polling centers - number required - definition.

Notwithstanding section 1-7.5-105, as soon as practicable after the date that the designated election official certifies the recall question to the ballot under section 1-12-111, any county clerk and recorder administering a recall election shall submit to the secretary of state, for approval within three business days after receipt, a proposed election plan that includes all information required by section 1-7.5-105. If the secretary of state does not provide written notice of approval or disapproval of the plan within three business days, the plan is deemed approved.

The secretary of state may disapprove an election plan submitted under subsection (1)(a) of this section using only the same standards used to evaluate and approve of election plans transmitted under section 1-7.5-105.

Notwithstanding any provision of this code:

The designated election official conducting the recall election shall designate the office of the county clerk and recorder or other suitable location to provide a mail ballot or replacement ballot to a registered elector requesting the ballot at the office of the county clerk and recorder or other designated location from the twenty-second day prior to the final day of voting in such election through that final day of voting; and

Not earlier than the twenty-second day or later than the eighteenth day before the election, the designated election official shall mail ballots to all active registered electors.

There must be one voter service and polling center for each thirty thousand active registered electors in the district of the incumbent sought to be recalled; except that any such district must have at least one voter service and polling center, and each district that spans more than one county must operate one voter service and polling center within the boundaries of each county. Each voter service and polling center must be open from the eighth day prior to the final day of voting in the recall election through the final day. Each voter service and polling center required by this section must be open for eight hours Monday through Friday, four hours on Saturday, and need not be open on Sunday. On the final day of voting, each voter service and polling center required by this section must be open from 7 a.m. to 7 p.m.

When a recall election is combined with a general election in even years pursuant to article XXI of the state constitution and section 1-12-111, the number and days of operation of voter service and polling centers and the manner of voting for the recall as part of said general election are the same as those prescribed under section 1-5-102.9. When a recall election is combined with a general election in odd years pursuant to article XXI of the state constitution and section 1-12-111, the number and days of operation of voter service and polling centers and the manner of voting for the recall as part of said general election are the same as those prescribed under section 1-7.5-107.

As used in this section, and for purposes of article XXI of the state constitution, "part of said general election" means the inclusion of the questions of both the recall of an incumbent and the election of the incumbent's successor on mail ballots that are sent by mail, available at voter service and polling centers, or otherwise delivered to an elector as permitted by law, from the date for holding the election through the last day of voting in a general election. Notwithstanding this definition, to maximize participation of voters covered by the federal "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq., all candidate races, ballot issues, and ballot questions that a covered voter is eligible to vote on must be included on the ballots required to be sent pursuant to that act, and recall-related ballot questions must be sent separately on ballots that adhere to the deadlines set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 796, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1796, § 64, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1046, § 14, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 619, § 7, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(4) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 587, § 65, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3035, § 48, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1663, § 61, effective June 21.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-12-115. Write-in candidates.

No write-in vote for any office shall be counted unless an affidavit of intent has been filed indicating that the person for whom the write-in vote is made desires the office and is legally qualified to assume the duties of the office if elected. The affidavit of intent must be filed with the designated election official no later than twenty-five calendar days before the date for holding the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 796, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 75, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1046, § 15, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1665, § 62, effective June 21.

1-12-116. Sufficiency of the recall.

If a majority of those voting on the question of the recall of any incumbent from office vote "no", the incumbent continues in office; if a majority vote "yes", the incumbent is removed from office upon the qualification of the successor. If an even number of electors vote "no" and "yes" on the question of the recall of the incumbent from office, the incumbent continues in office.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 796, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1665, § 63, effective June 21.

1-12-117. Nomination of successor - ballot certification.

For partisan elections, a candidate to succeed the officer sought to be recalled must meet the qualifications of a party candidate or an unaffiliated candidate as provided in part 8 of article 4 of this title 1 and must be nominated by a political party petition or an unaffiliated petition as provided in part 9 of article 4 of this title 1. Nomination petitions may be circulated beginning the first date on which a protest may be filed and must be filed no later than twenty-five calendar days prior to the date for holding the election as provided in section 1-12-111. If the election is to be held with a general election, nomination petitions must be filed no later than five days prior to the date to certify ballot content for the general election.

For nonpartisan elections, nomination petitions for candidates whose names are to appear on the ballot may be circulated beginning the first date on which a protest may be filed and must be filed no later than twenty-five calendar days prior to the date for holding the election as provided in section 1-12-111. If the election is to be held with a general election, nomination petitions must be filed no later than five days prior to the date to certify ballot content for the general election.

Every nomination petition must be signed by the number of eligible electors required for the office in part 8 of article 4 of this title 1 or as otherwise provided by law.

The designated election official shall verify successor candidate petitions within five days after the deadline to file such petitions as set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

The designated election official shall certify the ballot content as soon as possible, but not later than two business days after the date upon which the verification of successor candidate petitions is required pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section. If the recall election will be held as part of a general election, the designated election official shall certify the ballot content no later than the date all other content for the general election is required to be certified.

The officer who was sought to be recalled is not eligible as a candidate in the election to fill any vacancy resulting from the recall election.

For any special district recall election conducted under this section, the designated election official shall verify successor candidate self-nomination forms within two days of receiving the form. A successor candidate who files a self-nomination form that is deficient must be notified of the deficiency by the designated election official and may resubmit a corrected form no later than the deadline to certify the ballot content as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 797, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1179, § 71, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, pp. 849, 862, §§ 76, 123, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1064, § 8, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236 p. 1046, § 16, effective May 29.

L. 2014:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 621, § 8, effective May 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1665, § 64, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by sections 76 and 123 of House Bill 95-1241 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-12-118. Election of successor.

The election of a successor is held at the same time as the recall election. The names of those persons nominated as candidates to succeed the person sought to be recalled, except write-in candidates, shall appear on the ballot. The name of the person against whom the petition is filed shall not appear on the ballot as a candidate for office.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 850, § 77, effective July 1, 1995.)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 797, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 77, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1047, § 17, effective May 29.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 621, § 9, effective May 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-12-118.5. Postelection protest of successor candidate qualification - procedure.

Within seventy-two hours after certification of results of a recall election conducted under this article, any elector who is registered in a political subdivision represented by an official subject to recall may file a protest using the procedures in section 1-1-113 alleging that the successor candidate who received the highest number of votes fails to qualify for the office. The protest must be filed in the district court in the county in which the petition determination was issued.

Any protest filed under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) takes precedence over all other nonemergency civil matters before the district court.

If the court determines, pursuant to a protest filed under subsection (1) of this section, that the successor candidate against whom the protest is made fails to qualify, that individual may not take office. In such case, the office is deemed vacant and shall be filled according to law, including section 2 (3) of article V of the state constitution and part 2 of this article. The officer recalled in the recall election at which the unqualified successor was elected is ineligible to fill the vacancy.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 622, § 10, effective May 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-12-119. Canvass of votes - notification of results.

For the recall of a partisan officer, the canvass board shall be composed of one representative from each major political party and the county clerk and recorder.

For the recall of a nonpartisan officer, the canvass board shall be composed of the designated election official, one member of the governing body, and one eligible elector of the political subdivision.

The canvass board shall complete and certify the abstract of votes in accordance with article 10 of this title.

If the majority of those voting on the recall question voted "yes", upon receipt of the certified abstract of votes cast, the designated election official shall issue a certificate of election to the successor candidate who received the highest number of votes. A copy of the certificate shall be transmitted by the secretary of state to the appropriate house of the general assembly for recall elections concerning the general assembly and to the governor for the recall of all other elections of state officers. For all other recall elections, a copy of the certificate shall be transmitted to the governing body of the political subdivision. The candidate who received the highest number of votes shall be sworn in and shall assume the duties of the office upon certification of the election results.

If less than a majority of those voting on the recall question voted "yes", upon receipt of the certified abstract of votes cast, the designated election official shall notify in writing the incumbent, each candidate for the office, the committee, and the governing body of the incumbent.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 797, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 850, § 78, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 491, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1047, § 18, effective May 29.

1-12-120. Cost of recall election.

If at any recall election for a state office the incumbent whose recall is sought is not recalled, the incumbent shall be repaid from the state treasury any money authorized by this article which the incumbent actually expended as an expense of the recall election. In no event shall the sum repaid be greater than an amount equal to ten cents per voter. The general assembly shall provide an appropriation for state recall elections.

If, at any recall election for a county or local government office, an election is held and the incumbent is not recalled, the governing body shall authorize a resolution for repayment from the general fund of the political subdivision any money authorized to be repaid to the incumbent by this article 12, which the incumbent actually expended as an expense of the election. In no event shall the sum repaid exceed forty cents per eligible elector as defined in section 1-1-104 (16), subject to a maximum repayment of ten thousand dollars.

Authorized expenses only include money spent after a petition has been deemed sufficient by the designated election official in challenging the sufficiency of the recall petition and in presenting to the electors the official position of the incumbent, including campaign literature, advertising, and maintaining campaign headquarters.

Unauthorized expenses include money spent prior to the date on which a petition has been deemed sufficient by the designated election official; money spent on challenges and court actions not pertaining to the sufficiency of the recall petition; personal expenses for meals; lodging and mileage for the incumbent; costs of maintaining a campaign staff and associated expenses; reimbursement for expenses incurred by a campaign committee which has solicited contributions; reimbursement of any kind for employees in the incumbent's office; and all expenses incurred prior to the filing of the recall petition.

The incumbent shall file a complete and detailed request for reimbursement within sixty days after the date of the recall election with the governing body of the political subdivision holding the recall election, who shall then review the reimbursement request for appropriateness under subsection (2) of this section and shall refer the request, with recommendations, to the general assembly at its next general session for state recall elections or to the treasurer of the governing body for all other elections within thirty days after receipt of the request for reimbursement.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 798, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1064, § 9, effective May 27.

L. 2021:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1666, § 65, effective June 21.

1-12-120.5. Reimbursement for recall election expenses.

A political subdivision shall reimburse the office of the county clerk and recorder for reasonable expenses incurred by the county clerk and recorder in performing duties relating to the recall of an incumbent of the political subdivision under this part 1.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1048, § 19, effective May 29.

1-12-121. Special provisions.

If the governor is sought to be recalled under this article by recall petition filed in the office of the secretary of state, the duties imposed upon the governor by this article and article XXI of the state constitution as to that recall petition shall be performed by the lieutenant governor. If the secretary of state is sought to be recalled under this article by recall petition filed in the office of the secretary of state, the duties imposed upon the secretary of state by this article and article XXI of the state constitution as to that recall petition shall be performed by the state auditor.

If recall is sought of any other elected or appointed officer who is charged with responsibilities under this article, the governing body shall immediately appoint another person to perform those duties.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 799, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1293), ch. 236, p. 1048, § 20, effective May 29.

1-12-122. Recalls subject to "Fair Campaign Practices Act".

Recall elections are subject to the appropriate sections of article 45 of this title.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 850, § 79, effective July 1.

1-12-123. Conflicts with constitutional requirements for recall of state officers or other elections laws.

To the extent that this part 1 concerning the recall of state officers conflicts with article XXI of the state constitution, article XXI of the state constitution controls.

To the extent that this part 1 conflicts with other provisions of this code, this part 1 controls.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1064, § 10, effective May 27.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 622, § 11, effective May 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.